Illinois, session 104th, SB3896.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wholesale Drug Distribution Licensing Act 5is amended by changing Sections 15, 26, 31, 40, 50, 56, 60, 80, 6155, 185, and 200 and by adding Section 25.7 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 120/15)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-15)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 11by the Department in the applicant's application file or 12licensee's license file maintained by the Department's 13licensure maintenance unit. 14    "Authentication" means the affirmative verification, 15before any wholesale distribution of a prescription drug 16occurs, that each transaction listed on the pedigree has 17occurred.18    "Authorized distributor of record" means a wholesale 19distributor or virtual wholesale distributor with whom a 20manufacturer has established an ongoing relationship to 21distribute the manufacturer's prescription drug. An ongoing 22relationship is deemed to exist between a wholesale 23distributor or virtual wholesale distributor and a   SB3896 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1manufacturer when the wholesale distributor or virtual 2wholesale distributor, including any affiliated group of the 3wholesale distributor or virtual wholesale distributor, as 4defined in Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code, complies 5with the following:6        (1) The wholesale distributor or virtual wholesale 7    distributor has a written agreement currently in effect 8    with the manufacturer evidencing the ongoing relationship; 9    and10        (2) The wholesale distributor or virtual wholesale 11    distributor is listed on the manufacturer's current list 12    of authorized distributors of record, which is updated by 13    the manufacturer on no less than a monthly basis. 14    "Blood" means whole blood collected from a single donor 15and processed either for transfusion or further manufacturing.16    "Blood component" means that part of blood separated by 17physical or mechanical means.18    "Board" means the State Board of Pharmacy of the 19Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.20    "Chain pharmacy warehouse" means a physical location for 21prescription drugs that acts as a central warehouse and 22performs intracompany sales or transfers of the drugs to a 23group of chain or mail order pharmacies that have the same 24common ownership and control. Notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Act, a chain pharmacy warehouse shall be 26considered part of the normal distribution channel.  SB3896 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    "Co-licensed partner or product" means an instance where 2one or more parties have the right to engage in the 3manufacturing or marketing of a prescription drug, consistent 4with the FDA's implementation of the Prescription Drug 5Marketing Act. 6    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 7Professional Regulation.8    "Drop shipment" means the sale of a prescription drug to a 9wholesale distributor or virtual wholesale distributor by the 10manufacturer of the prescription drug or that manufacturer's 11co-licensed product partner, that manufacturer's third-party 12logistics provider, or that manufacturer's exclusive 13distributor or by an authorized distributor of record that 14purchased the product directly from the manufacturer or one of 15these entities whereby the wholesale distributor, virtual 16wholesale distributor, or chain pharmacy warehouse takes title 17but not physical possession of such prescription drug and the 18wholesale distributor or virtual wholesale distributor 19invoices the pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, or other 20person authorized by law to dispense or administer such drug 21to a patient and the pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, or 22other authorized person receives delivery of the prescription 23drug directly from the manufacturer, that manufacturer's 24third-party logistics provider, or that manufacturer's 25exclusive distributor or from an authorized distributor of 26record that purchased the product directly from the   SB3896 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1manufacturer or one of these entities. 2    "Drug sample" means a unit of a prescription drug that is 3not intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of 4the drug.5    "Email address of record" means the designated email 6address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 7application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 8by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 9    "Facility" means a facility of a wholesale distributor 10where prescription drugs are stored, handled, repackaged, or 11offered for sale, or a facility of a third-party logistics 12provider where prescription drugs are stored or handled.13    "FDA" means the United States Food and Drug 14Administration. 15    "Manufacturer" means a person licensed or approved by the 16FDA to engage in the manufacture of drugs or devices, 17consistent with the definition of "manufacturer" set forth in 18the FDA's regulations and guidances implementing the 19Prescription Drug Marketing Act. "Manufacturer" does not 20include anyone who is engaged in the packaging, repackaging, 21or labeling of drugs only to the extent permitted under the 22Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act. 23    "Manufacturer's exclusive distributor" means anyone who 24contracts with a manufacturer to provide or coordinate 25warehousing, distribution, or other services on behalf of a 26manufacturer and who takes title to that manufacturer's   SB3896 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1prescription drug, but who does not have general 2responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the 3manufacturer's prescription drug. A manufacturer's exclusive 4distributor must be licensed as a wholesale distributor under 5this Act and, in order to be considered part of the normal 6distribution channel, must also be an authorized distributor 7of record. 8    "Normal distribution channel" means a chain of custody for 9a prescription drug that goes, directly or by drop shipment, 10from (i) a manufacturer of the prescription drug, (ii) that 11manufacturer to that manufacturer's co-licensed partner, (iii) 12that manufacturer to that manufacturer's virtual wholesale 13distributor third-party logistics provider, or (iv) that 14manufacturer to that manufacturer's exclusive distributor or 15third-party logistics provider to:16        (1) a pharmacy or to other designated persons 17    authorized by law to dispense or administer the drug to a 18    patient;19        (2) a wholesale distributor to a pharmacy or other 20    designated persons authorized by law to dispense or 21    administer the drug to a patient;22        (3) a wholesale distributor to a chain pharmacy 23    warehouse to that chain pharmacy warehouse's intracompany 24    pharmacy to a patient or other designated persons 25    authorized by law to dispense or administer the drug to a 26    patient;  SB3896 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1        (4) a chain pharmacy warehouse to the chain pharmacy 2    warehouse's intracompany pharmacy or other designated 3    persons authorized by law to dispense or administer the 4    drug to the patient;5        (5) an authorized distributor of record to one other 6    authorized distributor of record to an office-based health 7    care practitioner authorized by law to dispense or 8    administer the drug to the patient; or9        (6) an authorized distributor to a pharmacy or other 10    persons licensed to dispense or administer the drug.11    "Pedigree" means a document or electronic file containing 12information that records each wholesale distribution of any 13given prescription drug from the point of origin to the final 14wholesale distribution point of any given prescription drug. 15    "Person" means and includes a natural person, partnership, 16association, corporation, or any other legal business entity.17    "Pharmacy distributor" means any pharmacy licensed in this 18State or hospital pharmacy that is engaged in the delivery or 19distribution of prescription drugs either to any other 20pharmacy licensed in this State or to any other person or 21entity including, but not limited to, a wholesale drug 22distributor engaged in the delivery or distribution of 23prescription drugs who is involved in the actual, 24constructive, or attempted transfer of a drug in this State to 25other than the ultimate consumer except as otherwise provided 26for by law.  SB3896 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    "Prescription drug" means any human drug, including any 2biological product (except for blood and blood components 3intended for transfusion or biological products that are also 4medical devices), required by federal law or regulation to be 5dispensed only by a prescription, including finished dosage 6forms and bulk drug substances subject to Section 503 of the 7Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.8    "Repackage" means repackaging or otherwise changing the 9container, wrapper, or labeling to further the distribution of 10a prescription drug, excluding that completed by the 11pharmacist responsible for dispensing the product to a 12patient.13    "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Department of 14Financial and Professional Regulation.15    "Suspicious order" includes, but is not limited to, an 16order of a controlled substance of unusual size, an order of a 17controlled substance deviating substantially from a normal 18pattern, and orders of controlled substances of unusual 19frequency as defined by 21 U.S.C. 802. 20    "Third-party logistics provider" means anyone who 21contracts with a prescription drug manufacturer or virtual 22wholesale distributor to provide or coordinate warehousing, 23distribution, or other services on behalf of a manufacturer or 24virtual wholesale distributor, but does not take title to the 25prescription drug or have general responsibility to direct the 26prescription drug's sale or disposition.  SB3896 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    "Wholesale distribution" means the distribution of 2prescription drugs to persons other than a consumer or 3patient, but does not include any of the following:4        (1) Intracompany sales of prescription drugs, meaning 5    (i) any transaction or transfer between any division, 6    subsidiary, parent, or affiliated or related company under 7    the common ownership and control of a corporate entity or 8    (ii) any transaction or transfer between co-licensees of a 9    co-licensed product.10        (2) The sale, purchase, distribution, trade, or 11    transfer of a prescription drug or offer to sell, 12    purchase, distribute, trade, or transfer a prescription 13    drug for emergency medical reasons. 14        (3) The distribution of prescription drug samples by 15    manufacturers' representatives.16        (4) Drug returns, when conducted by a hospital, health 17    care entity, or charitable institution in accordance with 18    federal regulation.19        (5) The sale of minimal quantities of prescription 20    drugs by licensed pharmacies to licensed practitioners for 21    office use or other licensed pharmacies.22        (6) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to 23    sell, purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a 24    drug pursuant to a prescription.25        (7) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of 26    all or part of the business of a pharmacy or pharmacies   SB3896 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    from or with another pharmacy or pharmacies, whether 2    accomplished as a purchase and sale of stock or business 3    assets.4        (8) The sale, purchase, distribution, trade, or 5    transfer of a prescription drug from one authorized 6    distributor of record to one additional authorized 7    distributor of record when the manufacturer has stated in 8    writing to the receiving authorized distributor of record 9    that the manufacturer is unable to supply the prescription 10    drug and the supplying authorized distributor of record 11    states in writing that the prescription drug being 12    supplied had until that time been exclusively in the 13    normal distribution channel.14        (9) The delivery of or the offer to deliver a 15    prescription drug by a common carrier solely in the common 16    carrier's usual course of business of transporting 17    prescription drugs when the common carrier does not store, 18    warehouse, or take legal ownership of the prescription 19    drug.20        (10) The sale or transfer from a retail pharmacy, mail 21    order pharmacy, or chain pharmacy warehouse of expired, 22    damaged, returned, or recalled prescription drugs to the 23    original manufacturer, the originating wholesale 24    distributor, or a third party returns processor. 25        (11) The donation of drugs to the extent permitted 26    under the Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act.   SB3896 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    "Wholesale drug distributor" means anyone engaged in the 2wholesale distribution of prescription drugs into, out of, or 3within the State, including, without limitation, 4manufacturers; repackers; own label distributors; jobbers; 5private label distributors; brokers; warehouses, including 6manufacturers' and distributors' warehouses; manufacturer's 7exclusive distributors; and authorized distributors of record; 8drug wholesalers or distributors; independent wholesale drug 9traders; specialty wholesale distributors; retail pharmacies 10that conduct wholesale distribution; and chain pharmacy 11warehouses that conduct wholesale distribution. In order to be 12considered part of the normal distribution channel, a 13wholesale distributor must also be an authorized distributor 14of record.15    "Virtual wholesale distributor" means any person engaged 16in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs into, out 17of, or within the State who holds title to, but does not take 18physical possession of, prescription drugs. 19(Source: P.A. 102-389, eff. 1-1-22; 102-879, eff. 1-1-23; 20103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 21    (225 ILCS 120/25.7 new)22    Sec. 25.7. Virtual wholesale distributor licensing 23requirements.24    (a) Every virtual wholesale distributor that engages in 25virtual drug distribution of prescription drugs shall be   SB3896 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1licensed by the Department. A virtual wholesale distributor 2shall only contract with entities licensed under this Act to 3take physical possession of prescription drugs if the 4prescription drugs are being shipped into the State.5    (b) Each applicant for licensure as a virtual wholesale 6distributor under this Act shall submit the following 7information to the Department:8        (1) the name, full business address, and telephone 9    number of the applicant;10        (2) all trade or business names used by the applicant;11        (3) addresses, email addresses, telephone numbers, and 12    the names of contact persons for all facilities used by 13    the applicant for the storage, handling, and distribution 14    of prescription drugs;15        (4) the applicant's type of ownership or operation, 16    such as a partnership, corporation, or sole 17    proprietorship;18        (5) the name of each person with an ownership or 19    operation interest in the applicant, including the 20    following:21            (A) if the applicant is a natural person, the name 22        of the person;23            (B) if the applicant is a partnership, the name of 24        each partner and the name of the partnership;25            (C) if the applicant is a corporation, the name 26        and title of each person who owns 5% or more of its   SB3896 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1        stock and each corporate officer and director and the 2        name of the state of incorporation;3            (D) if the applicant is a sole proprietorship, the 4        full name of the sole proprietor and the name of the 5        business entity and the state of organization;6            (E) if the applicant is a limited liability 7        company, the name and title of each member or manager 8        and the name of the business entity and the state of 9        organization;10            (F) if the applicant is a limited liability 11        partnership, the name and title of each partner and 12        the name of the partnership and the state of 13        organization; and14            (G) if the applicant is a limited partnership, the 15        name and title of each partner and the name of the 16        partnership and the state of organization;17        (6) a list of all licenses and permits issued to the 18    applicant by any other state that authorizes the applicant 19    to purchase or facilitate the distribution of prescription 20    drugs;21        (7) minimum liability insurance and other insurance as 22    defined by rule;23        (8) the name and license number of the third-party 24    logistics provider who provides warehouse and shipping 25    services to the applicant; and26        (9) any additional information required by the   SB3896 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    Department.2    (c) A virtual wholesale distributor shall ensure that any 3licensed entity providing distribution services to the virtual 4wholesale distributor complies with the following:5        (1) the licensed entity is in compliance with all 6    rules related to storage and distribution of prescription 7    drugs;8        (2) the licensed entity has designated a 9    representative who is at least 21 years of age and who has 10    adequate education, experience, and training to be 11    employed by the licensed entity full time in a managerial 12    level position and to be actively involved in and aware of 13    the actual daily operation of the virtual wholesale 14    distributor;15        (3) the licensed entity contracts with carriers that 16    provide adequate security to guard against in-transit 17    losses; and18        (4) the licensed entity is compliant with Title II of 19    the federal Drug Quality and Security Act.20    (d) A virtual wholesale distributor shall not operate out 21of a location that is a residence or personal dwelling. 22    (225 ILCS 120/26)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)24    Sec. 26. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 25    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts   SB3896 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a wholesale 2drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, virtual wholesale 3distributor, or third-party logistics provider without being 4licensed to ship into, out of, or within the State under this 5Act shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, 6pay a civil penalty to the Department in an amount not to 7exceed $10,000 for each offense as determined by the 8Department. The civil penalty shall be assessed by the 9Department after a hearing is held in accordance with the 10provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision of a 11hearing for the discipline of a licensee.12    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 13investigate any and all unlicensed activity.14    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 15the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 16The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 17execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 18any court of record.19(Source: P.A. 101-420, eff. 8-16-19.) 20    (225 ILCS 120/31)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)22    Sec. 31. Expiration of license; renewal.23    (a) The expiration date and renewal period for each 24license issued under this Act shall be set by rule.25    (b) Any licensee who shall engage in the practice for   SB3896 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1which the license was issued while the license is expired or on 2inactive status shall be considered to be practicing without a 3license which shall be grounds for discipline under this Act.4    (c) A wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale 5distributor, or third-party logistics provider whose license 6has been expired for one year or more may not have its license 7restored but must apply for a new license and meet all 8requirements for licensure. Any wholesale drug distributor, 9virtual wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics 10provider whose license has been expired for less than one year 11may apply for restoration of its license and shall have its 12license restored.13    (d) Anyone operating on an expired license is engaged in 14unlawful practice and subject to discipline under this Act.15(Source: P.A. 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 16    (225 ILCS 120/40)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-40)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)18    Sec. 40. Rules and regulations. The Department shall make 19any rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, as may 20be necessary to carry out the purposes and enforce the 21provisions of this Act. All rules and regulations promulgated 22under this Section shall conform to wholesale drug distributor 23licensing guidelines formally adopted by the FDA at 21 C.F.R. 24Part 205. In case of conflict between any rule or regulation 25adopted by the Department and any FDA wholesale drug   SB3896 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or third-party 2logistics provider guideline, the FDA guideline shall control.3(Source: P.A. 101-420, eff. 8-16-19; 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 4    (225 ILCS 120/50)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-50)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)6    Sec. 50. Inspection powers; access to records. 7    (a) Any pharmacy investigator authorized by the Department 8has the right of entry for inspection of premises purporting 9or appearing to be used by a wholesale drug distributor, 10virtual wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics 11provider in this State, including the business premises of a 12person licensed pursuant to this Act. This right of entry 13shall permit the authorized pharmacy investigator unfettered 14access to the entire business premises. Any attempt to hinder 15an authorized pharmacy investigator from inspecting the 16business premises and documenting the inspection shall be a 17violation of this Act. The duly authorized investigators shall 18be required to show appropriate identification before being 19given access to the a wholesale drug distributor's premises 20and delivery vehicles.21    (b) With the exception of the most recent 12 months of 22records that must be kept on the premises where the drugs are 23stored, wholesale drug distributors, virtual wholesale 24distributors, and third-party logistics providers may keep 25records regarding purchase and sales transactions   SB3896 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1electronically at a central location apart from the principal 2office of the wholesale drug distributor or the location at 3which the drugs were stored and from which they were shipped, 4provided that the records shall be made readily available for 5inspection within 2 working days of a request by the 6Department. The records may be kept in any form permissible 7under federal law applicable to prescription drugs record 8keeping.9    (c) (Blank).10(Source: P.A. 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 11    (225 ILCS 120/56)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)13    Sec. 56. Restrictions on transactions.14    (a) A licensee shall receive prescription drug returns or 15exchanges from a pharmacy or other persons authorized to 16administer or dispense drugs or a chain pharmacy warehouse 17pursuant to the terms and conditions of the agreement between 18the wholesale distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 19third-party logistics provider and the pharmacy or chain 20pharmacy warehouse. Returns of expired, damaged, recalled, or 21otherwise non-saleable pharmaceutical products shall be 22distributed by the receiving wholesale distributor or 23third-party logistics provider only to either the original 24manufacturer or a third party returns processor. Returns or 25exchanges of prescription drugs, saleable or otherwise,   SB3896 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1including any redistribution by a receiving wholesaler, shall 2not be subject to the pedigree requirements of Section 57 of 3this Act, so long as they are exempt from the pedigree 4requirement of the FDA's currently applicable Prescription 5Drug Marketing Act guidance. Both licensees under this Act and 6pharmacies or other persons authorized to administer or 7dispense drugs shall be accountable for administering their 8returns process and ensuring that the aspects of this 9operation are secure and do not permit the entry of 10adulterated and counterfeit product.11    (b) A manufacturer, or wholesale distributor, virtual 12wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics provider 13licensed under this Act may furnish prescription drugs only to 14a person licensed by the appropriate state licensing 15authorities. Before furnishing prescription drugs to a person 16not known to the manufacturer or licensee wholesale 17distributor, the manufacturer or licensee wholesale 18distributor must affirmatively verify that the person is 19legally authorized to receive the prescription drugs by 20contacting the appropriate state licensing authorities.21    (c) Prescription drugs furnished by a manufacturer, or 22wholesale distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 23third-party logistics provider licensed under this Act may be 24delivered only to the premises listed on the license, provided 25that the manufacturer or licensee wholesale distributor may 26furnish prescription drugs to an authorized person or agent of   SB3896 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1that person at the premises of the manufacturer or licensee 2wholesale distributor if:3        (1) the identity and authorization of the recipient is 4    properly established; and5        (2) this method of receipt is employed only to meet 6    the immediate needs of a particular patient of the 7    authorized person.8    (d) Prescription drugs may be furnished to a hospital 9pharmacy receiving area, provided that a pharmacist or 10authorized receiving personnel signs, at the time of delivery, 11a receipt showing the type and quantity of the prescription 12drug received. Any discrepancy between the receipt and the 13type and quantity of the prescription drug actually received 14shall be reported to the delivering manufacturer, or wholesale 15distributor, or third-party logistics provider by the next 16business day after the delivery to the pharmacy receiving 17area.18    (e) A manufacturer, or wholesale distributor, or virtual 19wholesale distributor licensed under this Act may not accept 20payment for, or allow the use of, a person or entity's credit 21to establish an account for the purchase of prescription drugs 22from any person other than the owner of record, the chief 23executive officer, or the chief financial officer listed on 24the license of a person or entity legally authorized to 25receive the prescription drugs. Any account established for 26the purchase of prescription drugs must bear the name of the   SB3896 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1licensee. This subsection (e) shall not be construed to 2prohibit a pharmacy or chain pharmacy warehouse from receiving 3prescription drugs if payment for the prescription drugs is 4processed through the pharmacy's or chain pharmacy warehouse's 5contractual drug manufacturer or wholesale distributor. 6(Source: P.A. 95-689, eff. 10-29-07.) 7    (225 ILCS 120/60)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-60)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 60. Wholesaler licensing; complaints. The Department 10may refuse to issue a license to establish a new licensed 11wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 12third-party logistics provider distributorship, if an owner of 13the entity wholesale drug distributorship applying for a 14license was an owner of a wholesale drug distributor, virtual 15wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics provider 16distributorship that had its license revoked, unless the owner 17presents sufficient evidence indicating rehabilitation. Once a 18complaint has been filed by the Department against a wholesale 19drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 20third-party logistics provider distributorship the Department 21may refuse to issue a license to establish a new licensed 22wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 23third-party logistics provider distributorship, until such 24time as the Department issues a decision on the complaint if an 25owner of the new wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale   SB3896 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1distributor, or third-party logistics provider distributorship 2was also an owner of a wholesale drug distributor, virtual 3wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics provider 4distributorship against which the complaint was filed. Neither 5an application for change of ownership nor for a change of 6location for any such entity wholesale drug distributorship 7shall be acted on by the Department until such time as the 8Department issues a decision on the complaint. In the event 9that the wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale 10distributor, or third-party logistics provider distributorship 11against which the complaint has been filed ceases to be 12licensed by the Department, for any reason, before the 13Department's decision on the complaint and an owner or that 14wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 15third-party logistics provider distributorship applies for a 16license to establish a new wholesale drug distributor, virtual 17wholesale distributor, or third-party logistics provider 18distributorship, the Department shall conduct a hearing on the 19complaint earlier filed, regardless of whether that wholesale 20drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 21third-party logistics provider distributorship is presently 22licensed by the Department. If the conduct for which the 23complaint was originally filed would have been sufficient to 24result in a revocation of a license to operate a licensed 25wholesale drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 26third-party logistics provider distributorship, then the   SB3896 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1conduct shall constitute sufficient grounds for denial of an 2application for a license.3(Source: P.A. 87-594.) 4    (225 ILCS 120/80)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-80)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)6    Sec. 80. Violations of Act. 7    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 8Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 9Illinois through the Attorney General of the State of Illinois 10or the State's Attorney of any county in which the action is 11brought, petition for an order enjoining the violation or for 12an order enforcing compliance with this Act. Upon the filing 13of a verified petition in the court, the court may issue a 14temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, and may 15preliminarily and permanently enjoin the violation. If it is 16established that the person has violated or is violating the 17injunction, the Court may punish the offender for contempt of 18court. Proceedings under this Section shall be in addition to, 19and not in lieu of, all other remedies and penalties provided 20by this Act.21    (b) Whoever knowingly conducts business as a wholesale 22drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 23third-party logistics provider in this State without being 24appropriately licensed under this Act shall be guilty of a 25Class A misdemeanor for a first violation and for each   SB3896 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1subsequent conviction shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.2    (c) Whenever in the opinion of the Department any person 3not licensed in good standing under this Act violates any 4provision of this Act, the Department may issue a rule to show 5cause why an order to cease and desist should not be entered 6against him. The rule shall clearly set forth the grounds 7relied upon by the Department and shall provide a period of 7 8days from the date of the rule to file an answer to the 9satisfaction of the Department. Failure to answer to the 10satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to cease 11and desist to be issued immediately.12(Source: P.A. 101-420, eff. 8-16-19; 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 13    (225 ILCS 120/155)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-155)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)15    Sec. 155. Temporary suspension of license; hearing. The 16Secretary may temporarily suspend licensure as a wholesale 17drug distributor, virtual wholesale distributor, or 18third-party logistics provider, without a hearing, 19simultaneously with the institution of proceedings for a 20hearing provided for in Section 85 of this Act, if the 21Secretary finds that evidence in his or her possession 22indicates that a continuation in business would constitute an 23imminent danger to the public. In the event that the Secretary 24temporarily suspends a license or certificate without a 25hearing, a hearing by the Department must be held within 10   SB3896 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1days after the suspension has occurred and be concluded 2without appreciable delay.3(Source: P.A. 101-420, eff. 8-16-19; 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 4    (225 ILCS 120/185)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8301-185)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)6    Sec. 185. Home rule preemption. The regulation and 7licensing of wholesale drug distributors, virtual wholesale 8distributors, and third-party logistics providers are 9exclusive powers and functions of the State. A home rule unit 10may not regulate or license wholesale drug distributors, 11virtual wholesale distributors, and third-party logistics 12providers. This Section is a denial and limitation of home 13rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of 14Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.15(Source: P.A. 87-594.) 16    (225 ILCS 120/200)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)18    Sec. 200. Drugs in shortage.19    (a) For the purpose of this Section, "drug in shortage" 20means a drug, as defined in Section 356c of the Federal Food, 21Drug, and Cosmetic Act, listed on the drug shortage list 22maintained by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in 23accordance with Section 356e of the Federal Food, Drug, and 24Cosmetic Act.  SB3896 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1    (b) Any person engaged in the wholesale distribution of a 2drug in shortage in this State must be licensed by the 3Department.4    (c) It is unlawful for any person, other than a 5manufacturer, a manufacturer's exclusive distributor, a 6virtual wholesale distributor, a third-party logistics 7provider, or an authorized distributor of record, to purchase 8or receive a drug in shortage from any person not licensed by 9the Department. This subsection (c) does not apply to the 10return of drugs or the purchase or receipt of drugs pursuant to 11any of the distributions that are specifically excluded from 12the definition of "wholesale distribution" in Section 15 of 13the Wholesale Drug Distribution Licensing Act. 14    (d) A person found to have violated a provision of this 15Section shall be subject to administrative fines, orders for 16restitution, and orders for disgorgement.17    (e) The Department shall create a centralized, searchable 18database of those entities licensed to engage in wholesale 19distribution, including manufacturers, wholesale 20distributors, virtual wholesale distributors, and pharmacy 21distributors, to enable purchasers of a drug in shortage to 22easily verify the licensing status of an entity offering such 23drugs.24    (f) The Department shall establish a system for reporting 25the reasonable suspicion that a violation of this Act has been 26committed by a distributor of a drug in shortage. Reports made   SB3896 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20398 AAS 33859 b1through this system shall be referred to the Office of the 2Attorney General and the appropriate State's Attorney's office 3for further investigation and prosecution.4    (g) The Department shall adopt rules to carry out the 5provisions of this Section. 6    (h) Nothing in this Section prohibits one hospital 7pharmacy from purchasing or receiving a drug in shortage from 8another hospital pharmacy in the event of a medical emergency. 9(Source: P.A. 102-879, eff. 1-1-23.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.